Mississippi, session 2026, SB2846.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following shall be codified as Section 21-45-23, Mississippi Code of 1972: 21-45-23.  (1)  As an alternative financing mechanism for redevelopment projects, a municipality authorized to undertake a redevelopment project and issue tax increment bonds or refunding bonds under this chapter may, at its option, enter into a taxpayer agreement with the owner or developer of real property located within a project area.  A taxpayer agreement may be used to: (a)  Guarantee, enhance or otherwise secure the repayment of bonds, notes or other obligations issued to finance the costs of a redevelopment project; (b)  Provide for payments in lieu of, or in addition to, tax increment revenues; or (c)  Provide for any other payment obligation from a municipality or other source, whether public or private, to support the financing or refinancing of the costs of a redevelopment project. (2)  A taxpayer agreement entered into under this section: (a)  Constitutes a voluntary and binding contractual payment obligation of the property owner or developer in connection with the ad valorem taxes to be paid on a project area; (b)  Shall not be considered a tax, fee or assessment imposed by a municipality; (c)  Shall not constitute a pledge of the faith, credit or taxing power of the State of Mississippi or any municipality; (d)  Shall not constitute indebtedness of the state or any municipality for purposes of any constitutional or statutory debt limitation; (e)  Shall not be considered a fee-in-lieu agreement or an exemption from taxation under the Constitution and laws of the state; and (f)  Shall be for a term not to exceed thirty (30) years. (3)  If a taxpayer agreement provides that payments due under the taxpayer agreement are secured by a lien on real property: (a)  The lien shall arise automatically upon execution and recordation of the taxpayer agreement; (b)  The lien shall have parity with ad valorem tax liens, subordinate only to previously filed ad valorem tax liens; (c)  The lien shall take priority over any subsequent mortgage, judgment, lien or other encumbrance on the property; and (d)  The lien may be enforced, collected and foreclosed in the same manner as delinquent ad valorem taxes under the laws of the state.  A lien created under this section shall exist only for the duration and to the extent provided in the taxpayer agreement. (4)  A taxpayer agreement creating a lien under this section shall be recorded in the office of the chancery clerk of the county in which the property is located.  Recordation shall provide constructive notice and shall perfect the lien without further action. (5)  Payments due under a taxpayer agreement shall be deemed delinquent when unpaid on the date specified in the taxpayer agreement.  All interest, penalties, fees and collection costs applicable to delinquent ad valorem taxes shall apply to delinquent taxpayer agreement payments. (6)  A municipality may assign its rights under a taxpayer agreement, including the right to receive payments, any lien securing such payments, and the rights to enforce such lien, to a trustee, bondholder or purchaser of bonds issued to finance the costs of a redevelopment project.  An assignee shall possess all enforcement rights held by the municipality. (7)  In addition to any other authority granted in this chapter, a municipality may issue bonds, notes or other obligations as a conduit issuer to finance the costs of a redevelopment project.  Such obligations may be secured by: (a)  Payments due under one or more taxpayer agreements; (b)  Any lien created by one or more taxpayer agreements; (c)  Tax increment revenues; or (d)  Any combination of the foregoing or other private security. The municipality issuing such bonds shall have no obligation to advance funds, levy taxes (other than in the ordinary course in connection with the redevelopment project) or appropriate money for the payment of such obligations.  Bonds issued under this subsection (7) shall be payable solely from the security pledged and shall not constitute a general obligation of the municipality or the state. (8)  Upon full payment of all obligations secured by a taxpayer agreement, the municipality shall execute and record a release of lien, which shall extinguish the lien upon recordation. (9)  Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a municipality to enter into a taxpayer agreement. SECTION 2.  Section 21-45-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 21-45-3.  For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall have the meanings given them in this section unless a different meaning is clearly indicated by the context: (a)  "Project area" includes: (i)  Areas in which there is a significant amount of buildings or improvements which, by reason of dilapidation, deterioration, age, obsolescence, inadequate provision for ventilation, light, air, sanitation or open spaces, high density of population and overcrowding or the existence of conditions which endanger life or property by fire and other causes, or any combination of such factors, are conducive to ill health, transmission of disease, infant mortality, juvenile delinquency or crime and are detrimental to the public health, safety, morals or welfare; (ii)  Areas in which are located a building or buildings that are of important value for purposes of historical preservation, as designated by the Department of Archives and History; (iii)  Areas which by reason of a significant amount of defective or inadequate street layout, faulty lot layout in relation to size, adequacy, accessibility or usefulness, unsanitary or unsafe conditions, deterioration of site improvements, diversity of ownership, tax delinquency, defective or unusual conditions of title, improper subdivision or obsolete platting or the existence of conditions which endanger life or property by fire or other causes, or any combination of such factors, substantially impair or arrest the sound growth of the community, retard the provision of housing accommodations or constitute an economic or social liability and are a menace to the public health, safety, morals or welfare in their present condition and use; (iv)  Areas in which the construction, renovation, repair or rehabilitation of property for residential, commercial or other uses is in the public interest; or (v)  A project for which a certificate of public convenience and necessity has been obtained by the municipality pursuant to the Regional Economic Development Act. (b)  A "redevelopment project" may include any work or undertaking by a municipality: (i)  To acquire project areas or portions thereof, including lands, structures or improvements the acquisition of which is necessary or incidental to the proper clearance, development or redevelopment of such areas or to the prevention of the spread or recurrence of slum conditions or conditions of blight; (ii)  To clear any project areas by demolition or removal of existing buildings, structures, streets, utilities or other improvements thereon and to install, construct or reconstruct streets, utilities, bulkheads, boat docks and site improvements essential to the preparation of sites for uses in accordance with the redevelopment plan and public improvements to encourage private redevelopment in accordance with the redevelopment plan; or (iii)  To sell or lease property acquired by a municipality as part of a redevelopment project for not less than its fair value for uses in accordance with such redevelopment plan to retain property or public improvements for public use in accordance with the redevelopment plan. "Redevelopment project" may also include the preparation of a redevelopment plan, the planning, survey and other work incident to a redevelopment project and the preparation of all plans and arrangements for carrying out a redevelopment project, relocation of businesses and families required under applicable law, and upon a determination, by resolution of the governing body of the municipality in which such land is located, that the acquisition and development of additional real property not within a project area is essential to the proper clearance or redevelopment of a project area or a necessary part of the general slum clearance program of the municipality, the acquisition, planning, preparation for development or disposal of such land shall constitute a redevelopment project.  In connection with a project undertaken by a developer under Section 21-45-9 or 21-45-23, "redevelopment project" may include the costs of the acquisition, construction, installation and equipping of public or private improvements, including, but not limited to, buildings. (c) "Redevelopment plan" means a plan for the acquisition, clearance, reconstruction, rehabilitation or future use of a redevelopment project area which shall be sufficiently complete: (i)  To indicate its relationship to definite local objectives as to appropriate land uses and improved traffic, public transportation, public utilities, recreational, residential, commercial and community facilities and other public improvements; and (ii)  To indicate proposed land uses, waterfront uses, if any, and building requirements in the area. A redevelopment plan may include interlocal cooperation agreements between a municipality and a county whereby both agree to pledge revenues payable to them to fund the debt of service of any indebtedness incurred pursuant to this chapter. (d)  "Governing body" means the governing body of any municipality or the board of supervisors of any county. (e) "Developer" means any person, firm, corporation, partnership or other entity which enters into an agreement with a municipality whereby the developer agrees to construct, operate and maintain or procure the construction, operation and maintenance of buildings or other facilities or improvements upon land or waterfront being a part of a redevelopment project. (f)  "Municipality" means any city or town incorporated under the laws of the State of Mississippi or any county. (g)  "Clerk" means the municipal clerk or chancery clerk, as the case may be. (h)  "Taxpayer agreement" means a voluntary written agreement entered into under Section 21-45-23 between a municipality and the owner or developer of real property located within a project area. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.